District of Columbia statutes.
46-501

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(3).

(2)

“Domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

(3)

“Premarital agreement” means an agreement between prospective spouses or prospective domestic partners made in contemplation of marriage or domestic partnership and to be effective upon marriage or domestic partnership.

(4)

“Property” means an interest, present or future, legal or equitable, vested or contingent, in real or personal property, including income and earnings.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 2, 42 DCR 6770
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 8(a), 53 DCR 1035

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-141.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-79 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.